Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5391XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2001 Section 1. Section 724.29, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 724.29 Firearm devices. 3 1. For purposes of this section, âtrigger crankâ means 4 any device or instrument to be attached to a firearm that 5 repeatedly activates the trigger of the firearm through the use 6 of a lever or other part that is turned in a circular motion. 7 âTrigger crankâ does not include any weapon initially designed 8 and manufactured to fire through the use of a crank or lever. 9 2. A person who sells or offers for sale a manual or 10 power-driven trigger activating device constructed and designed 11 so that when attached to a firearm increases the rate of 12 fire of the firearm trigger crank is guilty of an aggravated 13 misdemeanor. 14